Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-621.01
Improvements of streets and alleys; use of salt stabilized base or armor coating, when.

A city of the first class may improve its streets and alleys by the use of salt stabilized base or armor coating in the same manner, to the same extent, and with the same limitations as provided by law for paving or repaving such streets or alleys. All provisions of law respecting paving or repaving by a city of the first class shall apply to any improvements made under the authority of this section.

Laws 1961, c. 45, § 1, p. 177.